Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 3 Administrative Procedure
§ 16-3-103.
Adoption, amendment and repeal of rules; notice; hearing; emergency rules; proceedings to contest; review and approval by governor.

Prior to an agency’s adoption, amendment or repeal of all rules other than interpretative rules or statements of general policy, the agency shall:

Give at least forty-five (45) days notice of its intended action. Notice shall be mailed to all persons making timely requests of the agency for advanced notice of its rulemaking proceedings and to the attorney general, the secretary of state’s office as registrar of rules, and the legislative service office if a state agency. The agency shall submit a copy of the proposed rules, in a format conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, with the notice given to the legislative service office. The notice shall include:

The time when, the place where and the manner in which interested persons may present their views on the intended action;

A statement of the terms and substance of the proposed rule or a description of the subjects and issues involved;

If an amendment or a repeal, the citation to the agency rule to be amended or repealed;

If new rules, a statement that they are new rules and a citation of the statute which authorizes adoption of the rules;

The place where an interested person may obtain a copy of the proposed rules in a format conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section;

If the agency asserts that all or a portion of a rule is proposed to be adopted, amended or repealed in order for the state to comply with federal law or regulatory requirements:

A statement that the adoption, amendment or repeal of the rule is required by federal law or regulation together with citations to the applicable federal law or regulation; and

A statement whether the proposed rule change meets minimum federal requirements or whether the proposed rule change exceeds minimum federal requirements.

A statement whether the proposed rule change meets minimum substantive state statutory requirements or whether the proposed rule change exceeds minimum substantive state statutory requirements. If the rule change exceeds minimum substantive state statutory requirements, the agency shall include a statement explaining the reason why the rule exceeds minimum substantive statutory requirements;

A statement that the agency has complied with the requirements of W.S.

9-5-304

and the location where an interested person may obtain a copy of the assessment used to evaluate the proposed rule pursuant to W.S.

9-5-304

;

A concise statement of the principal reasons for adoption of the rule. In compliance with Tri-State Generation and Transmission Association, Inc. v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324 (Wyo. 1979), the statement shall include a brief explanation of the substance or terms of the rule and the basis and purpose of the rule;

If a state agency is proposing a rule that differs from the uniform rules listed in subsection (j) of this section, a statement of the reasons for varying from the uniform rules.

Afford all interested persons reasonable opportunity to submit data, views or arguments, orally or in writing, provided this period shall consist of at least forty-five (45) days from the later of the dates specified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and provided:

In the case of substantive rules, opportunity for oral hearing shall be granted if requested by twenty-five (25) persons, or by a governmental subdivision, or by an association having not less than twenty-five (25) members. No hearing under this subparagraph shall be conducted until at least forty-five (45) days after the later of:

The date notice of intended action is given under paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

The date notice is published if publication is required by subsection (e) of this section.

The agency shall consider fully all written and oral submissions respecting the proposed rule;

If prior to final adoption any person objects to the accuracy of a statement made by the agency pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i)(F)(I) or (II), the agency shall:

Provide the objecting person with a written response explaining and substantiating the agency’s position by reference to federal law or regulations; and

Include with the final rules submitted for review to the governor and legislative service office a concise statement of the objection and the agency’s response.

Upon adoption of the rule, the agency, if requested to do so by an interested person, either prior to adoption or within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall issue a concise statement of the principal reasons for overruling the consideration urged against its adoption.

Comply with the requirements of W.S. 9-5-304.

When an agency finds that an emergency requires the agency to proceed without notice or opportunity for hearing required by subsection (a) of this section, it may adopt emergency rules. An emergency rule is effective when filed. A state agency emergency rule shall bear the endorsement of the governor’s concurrence on the finding of emergency before the registrar of rules accepts the rule for filing. The rule so adopted shall be effective for no longer than one hundred twenty (120) days but the adoption of an identical rule under W.S. 16-3-103(a) or of an emergency rule under this subsection is not precluded. In no case shall identical or substantially similar emergency rules be effective for a total period of more than two hundred forty (240) days. A local agency may proceed with the emergency rule when notice of the emergency is filed with the local registrar of rules.

No rule is valid unless submitted, filed and adopted in substantial compliance with this section. A proceeding to contest any rule on the ground of noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this section must be commenced within two (2) years from the effective date of the rule.

No state agency rule or any amendment, repeal, modification or revision of the rule may be filed with the registrar of rules unless the rule has been submitted to the governor for review and the governor has approved and signed the rule. Except in the case of emergency rules and rules adopted by the game and fish commission fixing general hunting or fishing regulations, season or bag limits or establishing hunting areas, the governor shall not approve any rule until the date of receipt of the legislative management council’s recommendation under W.S. 28-9-106(a) or until forty (40) days after the rule is filed with the legislative service office pursuant to W.S. 28-9-103(b), whichever is sooner. During the process of approving rules, the governor may disapprove any portion of a rule not conforming to paragraphs (d)(i), (ii) or (iii) of this section by clearly indicating the portion of the rule disapproved and the basis for the disapproval. Only those portions of a rule approved by the governor shall be filed with the registrar of rules as provided by W.S. 16-3-104(a). Any portion of a rule disapproved by the governor shall be returned to the agency and shall be null and void and shall not be filed, implemented or enforced. The governor shall report his disapproval of any rule or portion thereof to the management council within fifteen (15) days. The governor shall not approve any rule or any amendment, repeal, modification or revision of the rule unless it:

Is within the scope of the statutory authority delegated to the adopting agency;

Appears to be within the scope of the legislative purpose of the statutory authority; and

Has been adopted in compliance with the procedural requirements of this act. For the purposes of this subsection, an “agency” means any authority, bureau, board, commission, department, division, officer or employee of the state, excluding the state legislature and the judiciary.

If a state agency created as a licensing or regulatory board or commission for any profession or occupation regulated under title 33 regularly publishes a newsletter, memorandum or other written or electronic communication which serves as a medium to provide information to members of the regulated profession or occupation, then in addition to the notice requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the agency shall publish within that medium the proposed rules in a format conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. If the agency determines publication in such manner is not practicable, it shall publish within the chosen medium at least once prior to taking final action to adopt, amend or repeal any rule notice of its intended rulemaking proceedings and make available the full text of all proposed changes in the format conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. This subsection shall not apply to emergency rules adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The state registrar of rules shall prescribe a format for state agencies to follow in preparing proposed amendments to existing rules which shall ensure that additions to and deletions from existing language are clearly indicated.

Upon receipt of a notice of intended action from a state agency under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the secretary of state’s office shall maintain a file of these notices and make them available for public inspection during regular business hours. A notice shall remain in the file until the rules are adopted or until the agency determines not to take action to adopt the proposed rules. To the extent that resources enable the office to do so, the secretary of state’s office shall make these notices available to the public electronically. The secretary of state may promulgate rules specifying the format of notices submitted by state agencies under this subsection. Compliance with this subsection shall not affect the validity of rules promulgated by state agencies.

An agency may incorporate, by reference in its rules and without publishing the incorporated matter in full, all or any part of a code, standard, rule or regulation that has been adopted by an agency of the United States or of this state, another state or by a nationally recognized organization or association, provided:

The agency determines that incorporation of the full text in agency rules would be cumbersome or inefficient given the length or nature of the rules;

The reference in the rules of the incorporating agency fully identifies the incorporated matter by location, date and otherwise, and states that the rule does not include any later amendments or editions of the incorporated matter;

The agency, organization or association originally issuing the incorporated matter makes copies of it readily available to the public;

The incorporating agency maintains and makes available for public inspection a copy of the incorporated matter at cost from the agency and the rules of the incorporating agency state where the incorporated matter is available on the internet as defined in W.S. 9-2-3219(a)(iii); and

The incorporating agency otherwise complies with all procedural requirements under this act and the rules of the registrar of state agency rules governing the promulgation and filing of agency rules.

Each state agency shall adopt as much of the uniform rules promulgated pursuant to the following provisions as is consistent with the specific and distinct requirements of the agency and state or federal law governing or applicable to the agency:

W.S. 16-3-102(d);

W.S. 16-4-204(e).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.21; Laws 1977, ch. 190, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 57, § 1; 1991, ch. 81, § 1; 1995, ch. 84, § 1; ch. 168, § 1; 1997, ch. 62, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 2001, ch. 175, § 1; 2003, ch. 139, § 1; 2004, ch. 75, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2013 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), added “this period shall consist of at least forty-five (45) days from the latter of the dates specified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and provided” at the end of the paragraph; and in (b) substituted “subsection (a)” for “paragraph (a)(i),” “W.S. 16-3-103(a)” for “W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i),” and inserted “or of an emergency rule under this subsection” following “identical rule under W.S. 16-3-103(a),” and the next-to-last sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 46, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (a)(i)(E).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “later” for “latter” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(i)(H) and (a)(iii).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(i)(J) and (a)(i)(K); in (h)(i), added “The agency determines that” at the beginning, substituted “cumbersome or inefficient given the length or nature of the rules” for “unduly cumbersome or expensive”; in (h)(iii), deleted “and the rules of the incorporating agency state where such copies are available” at the end; in (h)(iv), inserted “at cost from the agency,” deleted “copies of” preceding “the incorporated”, substituted “is available on the internet as defined in W.S. 9-2-1035(a)(iii)” for “are available at cost are available from the incorporating agency”; and added (j).

The 2015 amendment,

in (j)(ii), substituted
“16-4-204(e)” for “16-3-204(e).”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3219(a)(iii)" for "9-2-1035(a)(iii)" in (h)(iv).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Due process rights not infringed by prohibition of water variances. —

Given the various means by which a corporation could present its views as to a water turbidity standard, including the opportunity to participate in the promulgation process and to assure that there is procedural compliance, the opportunity to obtain judicial review, if it is affected in fact by the rule adopted, and the opportunity to seek the amendment or repeal of the rule, the corporation's rights to procedural due process are not infringed by the prohibition of water variances under § 35-11-601(o). United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Section provides minimum requirements of public rulemaking procedure with which agencies must comply.

Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

In order to initiate rulemaking proceedings, there must be compliance with this section,

which, among other things, requires 20 days' (now 30 days') notice of an agency's intended action prior to its adoption, amendment or repeal of all rules. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Board of equalization subject to Act. —

Board of equalization was required to follow procedures in the Administrative Procedure Act when prescribing rules and regulations, and did not have authority to hold a “fact-finding proceeding” or submit an “investigative report” to department of revenue concerning the department's appraisal methods. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Hearing merely informational where no indication of “intended action.” —

Where a corporation files a petition to amend or repeal a water turbidity standard and the public notice given by the environmental quality council of a hearing to be held on the petition merely states that there is to be the hearing, such notice gives no indication of the environmental quality council's “intended action,” and the hearing is merely informational. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Statement of reasons for adoption of rule required. —

Administrative agencies are required to provide a brief and concise statement of the principal reasons for the adoption of a rule. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

And reasons for requiring statement of reasons for overruling considerations urged against rule's adoption

are to assure that the agency considered any arguments made at the public hearing and to facilitate judicial review. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

Courts required to inquire into facts supporting rule's adoption. —

Once the principal reasons for the adoption of a rule are supplied, the courts are required to make a searching and careful inquiry into the facts, but are not empowered to substitute their judgment for that of the agency, nor to determine if the latter is supported by substantial evidence. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

County department of public assistance not bound by interpretative guideline in state manual. —

A county department of public assistance is not bound by an interpretative rule or guideline in the state social services manual, since such a guideline is not the equivalent of a duly promulgated rule or regulation having the force of law, and the failure of the department to follow the manual's review procedures does not deprive a party of his constitutional rights to due process and equal protection. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Change in tax valuation method not “rule.” —

Letters issued by the department of revenue and taxation to announce a change in the valuation method for calculating the severance tax on uranium ore did not constitute “rules” and therefore did not require adoption pursuant to this chapter. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

EQC and DEQ were proper parties to a proceeding challenging amendments to water quality rules. —

After the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council (EQC) adopted proposed revisions to Chapter 1 of the Wyoming Water Quality Rules and Regulations, the Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) filed a notice of intended rulemaking with the Wyoming Secretary of State's Office in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-103(a); petitioner special interest groups filed a petition to challenge the new rules and named the (DEQ) as respondent. The district court erred in dismissing the petition for lack of jurisdiction on the ground that the EQC was not named in the petition; the Supreme Court of Wyoming, held that both the EQC and the DEQ were both proper parties to this proceeding under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-11-101

through

35-11-1904

.
Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2010).

General permits. —

In an appeal involving the issuance of two general permits for the discharge of produced water from coal bed methane operations, the Department of Environmental Quality followed appropriate procedures when it issued the two general permits. The Supreme Court disagreed with the district court's ruling that general permits must be promulgated pursuant to the statutory procedures applicable to rulemaking.
Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality v. Wyo. Outdoor Council, 2012 WY 135, 286 P.3d 1045,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2012),Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality v. Wyo. Outdoor Council, 2012 WY 135, 286 P.3d 1045,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2012).

Matter relating to interpretative rule not ripe. —

In a case
seeking judicial review of the Wyoming Department of Health's provider
bulletin, the bulletin was an interpretative rule because it lacked
binding effect, and the Department had discretion to vary from the
subordinate provisions of the bulletin; the matter was not ripe for
review until it was applied or relied upon by the Department. Moreover,
the issue was not ripe because the issues raised would not have evaded
review based on the Department's inaction, and there was no harm
suffered
by the denial of judicial review Mt. Reg'l Servs. v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 69, 326 P.3d 182,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2014).

Quoted

in

In re Application for Certificate of Need by HCA Health Serv., 689 P.2d 108,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1984); Billings v. Wyoming Bd. of Outfitters & Guides, 2001 WY 81, 30 P.3d 557,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Wyoming Coalition v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 875 P.2d 729,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1994); McLean v. Hyland Enters., Inc., 2001 WY 111, 34 P.3d 1262,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2001); Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Compliance with provision of Administrative Procedure Act, 5 USC § 553(d), providing that, with certain exceptions, required publication of a substantive rule must be made at least 30 days before its effective date, 54 ALR Fed 553.

Right to statement of reasons, under Administrative Procedure Act (5 USC § 555(e)), for denial of written application, petition, or other request of interested person made in connection with agency proceeding, 57 ALR Fed 765.

Environmental Protection Agency's classifications of air quality control regions under § 107(d)(2) of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7407(d)(2)), 75 ALR Fed 328.

§ 16-3-104.
Filing of copies of rules; permanent register; effective dates; manner of preparation; advice and assistance of attorney general.

Each agency shall file in the office of the registrar of rules a certified copy of each rule adopted by it as approved by the governor. State agencies shall file each rule within seventy-five (75) days of the date of agency action adopting the rule or it is not effective. There shall be noted upon the rule a citation of the authority by which it or any part of it was adopted. The registrar of rules shall keep a permanent register of the rules open to public inspection. Not more than ten (10) days after a state agency files a copy of a rule in the office of the registrar of rules, the agency shall mail a notice that the rule has been filed to each person who was sent a notice under W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i). The notice shall contain a citation to the rule and the date it was filed. Failure to send the notice required under this subsection does not affect the effectiveness of the rule.

Each rule and any amendment or repeal adopted after June 1, 1982 is effective after filing in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and W.S.

28-9-108

except:

If a later date is required by statute or specified in the rule, the later date is the effective date;

Where the agency finds that an emergency exists and the finding is concurred in by the governor, a rule or amendment or repeal may be effective immediately upon filing with the registrar of rules and if a state agency, also with the legislative service office. Existing rules remain in effect unless amended or repealed, subject to this section or W.S.

28-9-105

or

28-9-106

.

Rules shall be prepared in the manner and form prescribed by the state registrar of rules. The registrar of rules may refuse to accept for filing any rule that does not conform to the prescribed form.

The attorney general shall furnish advice and assistance to all state agencies in the preparation of their regulations, and in revising, codifying and editing existing or new regulations.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.22; Laws 1977, ch. 190, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, ch. 85, § 1; 2003, ch. 139, § 1; 2004, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to exemption of promulgation of substantive rules and conduct of hearings of state board of parole from this chapter, except for filing of rules and regulations, see § 7-13-402(d).

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “seventy-five (75) days” for “sixty (60) days,” and deleted the third sentence, which read “Except for emergency rules and rules adopted by the game and fish commission fixing general hunting or fishing regulations, season or bag limits or establishing hunting areas, no state agency shall file a rule in the office of the registrar of rules sooner than forty (40) days after filing the rule with the legislative service office pursuant to W.S. 28-9-103(b).”

Laws 2004, ch. 46, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Prejudice may result from failure to adopt and file rules.—

A school board which terminates the employment of a continuing contract teacher may fail to show that the teacher is not prejudiced by the school district's failure to adopt rules of practice and file them as required by §

16-3-102

and this section. Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

Stated

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

For case note, “EDUCATIONAL LAW — Wyoming Refuses to Recognize Compensatory Education as a Remedy Under the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975. Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 529 (1989).

§ 16-3-105.
Compilation and indexing of administrative code; charges for copies; authentication by registrar.

The registrar of state agency rules shall compile, index and publish a Wyoming administrative code. The code shall:

Contain each rule adopted by a state agency, but shall not contain emergency rules;

Be compiled, numbered and indexed in a unified manner that permits the code to be easily amended and affords ease of use and accessibility to the public, including strong and effective word search capabilities;

Be available to the public at no charge through the Internet;

Be updated on the Internet as soon as practicable after the effective date of newly filed or amended rules.

The registrar of state agency rules may make a reasonable charge for any rules published except those furnished to state officers, agencies, members of the legislature or the legislative service office and others in the employment of the state and its political subdivisions requiring the rules in the performance of their duties. The registrar of local agency rules may make a reasonable charge for copies of any rule on file.

The registrar’s authenticated file stamp on a rule or publication of a rule shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the rule was adopted and filed in compliance with all requirements necessary to make it effective.

The registrar of state agency rules shall maintain and publish a current index of all state agency rules filed with the registrar. The index shall list the effective date of each set of rules or the effective date of each set of amendments to an agency’s rules. Copies of the index shall be distributed as provided by W.S. 16-3-105(b).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.23; Laws 1977, ch. 190, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-105

; Laws 1982, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 17, § 1; 2014 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “a Wyoming administrative code. The code shall” for “the rules adopted by each agency and remaining in effect,” and deleted the last sentence which read: “The compilation shall be supplemented or revised at least once every two (2) years”; added (a)(i) through (a)(iv); in the first sentence of (d), substituted “maintain and publish a current” for “annually compile and public an,” and deleted “as of December 31 of each year” at the end.

Supreme court takes judicial notice of state tax regulations. —

Where the rules and regulations of the state tax commission are not made a part of the record by the parties, the supreme court shall take judicial notice of them by obtaining certified copies from the secretary of state. Yeik v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 595 P.2d 965,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 427

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What rules, statements and interpretations adopted by federal agencies must be published, 77 ALR Fed 572.

§ 16-3-106.
Petition for promulgation, amendment or repeal of rules.

Any interested person may petition an agency requesting the promulgation, amendment or repeal of any rule and may accompany his petition with relevant data, views and arguments. Each agency may prescribe by rule the form of the petition and the procedure for its submission, consideration and disposition. Upon submission of a petition, the agency as soon as practicable either shall deny the petition in writing (stating its reasons for the denials) or initiate rulemaking proceedings in accordance with W.S.

16-3-103

. The action of the agency in denying a petition is final and not subject to review.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.24; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-106

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Due process rights not infringed by prohibition of water variances.—

Given the various means by which a corporation could present its views as to a water turbidity standard, including the opportunity to participate in the promulgation process and to assure that there is procedural compliance, the opportunity to obtain judicial review, if it is affected in fact by the rule adopted, and the opportunity to seek the amendment or repeal of the rule, the corporation's rights to procedural due process are not infringed by the prohibition of water variances under § 35-11-601(o). United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Legislative intent to restrict judicial review is clear and convincing in this section.

Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

Right of judicial review of administrative decisions is entirely statutory.

United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Challenges to state, federal rules determined under this section,not judicial review provision. —

Where a mother claiming Aid-to-Dependent-Children (AFCD) benefits contended that unless afforded a fair hearing she would have no forum in which to present challenges to the standard of need established by the department of health and social services; to the adoption of federal regulations in applying the Wyoming AFDC program without following the requirements for promulgation of the rules under the Wyoming statutes; and to the provisions in certain rules which she contended deny her an impartial decision maker, the district court correctly referred to this section, not §

16-3-114

, as the appropriate statutory procedure to treat with such issues. A fair hearing such as that which the mother sought is not the appropriate forum for resolving these questions. Walker v. Karpan, 726 P.2d 82,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1986).

“Rare or uncommon” lands classified by regulation. —

The Environmental Quality Council (EQC) cannot, pursuant to § 35-11-112(a)(v), classify lands within the state as “very rare or uncommon” without adopting by regulation the criteria or factors that will establish a standard for such a classification. Such standards must be adopted pursuant to a regular rulemaking proceeding conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993).

Denial of petition to amend or repeal water standard not reviewable.—

The denial of a corporation's petition to amend or repeal a water turbidity standard after an informational hearing is not subject to judicial review. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Exhaustion of remedies. —

In property owners'
dispute with respect to the State Engineer's and Board of Control's administration of permits in conjunction with the production of coal bed methane the property owners'
could have sought relief through agency rulemaking before bringing a declaratory judgment action.
William F. West Ranch, LLC v. Tyrrell, 2009 WY 62, 206 P.3d 722,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Goedert ex rel. Wolfe v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 991 P.2d 1225,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Fieldwide Unitization in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 433 (1972).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).